Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

Liability of Professional Societies

62-50-101. Limitation on liability of committee members.

No member of a duly appointed committee formed by a professional society to maintain the professional standards of the society as established by its bylaws shall be individually liable for defamation in or arising out of any act or proceeding undertaken or performed unless the member:

Acted outside the scope of functions for which the committee was formed;

Acted with malice;

Was grossly negligent regarding the truth or falsity of any matters; or

Failed to use a reasonable effort to discover the truth.

Acts 1981, ch. 526, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-5001.

62-50-102. Limitation on liability for communications to committee.

No person shall be individually liable as the result of the communication of any information in the possession of the person to any professional standards committee, if the communication is intended to aid the committee in the evaluation of the qualifications, fitness or character of a member or applicant for membership in any professional society unless the person:

Acted with malice;

Was grossly negligent regarding the truth or falsity of any matter; or

Failed to use a reasonable effort to discover the truth.

Acts 1981, ch. 526, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-5002.

62-50-103. Society not immune from liability.

This part shall not be construed to confer immunity from liability on any professional society.

A professional society is liable for the actual damages arising from proceedings of a committee established by the bylaws of the society for any wrongful charge against a member by the committee.

In any case in which, but for the enactment of this part, a cause of action would arise against a professional society, the cause of action shall exist as if this part had not been enacted.

Acts 1981, ch. 526, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-5003.